Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2920.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-2920.01. Joint legislative budget committee; annual review; rural health transformation program monies The administration shall report annually to the joint legislative budget committee for review of the use and distribution of monies received through the federal rural HEALTH transformation program. END_STATUTE